Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska83-932
Division of Community-Centered Services; duties.

The Division of Community-Centered Services shall:

(1) Coordinate all adult parole programs and services in the state and supervise the administration of such programs and services;

(2) Cooperate with the Division of Adult Services in the coordination of volunteer programs in the adult correctional facilities;

(3) Coordinate and supervise community educational programs to increase community awareness and understanding of the community rehabilitative programs of the division; and

(4) Perform all duties necessary to carry out the provisions of this section.

Laws 1975, LB 417, § 10;

Laws 1993, LB 31, § 78.